Utah statutes.
77-22b-2.    Refusal of witness to testify or produce evidence or
information.
(1)  A witness who has been served with notice under Section 77-22b-1 and
refuses to comply with the notice may be required to show cause before the
district court why the witness should not be compelled to testify or otherwise
produce evidence or information.
(2)  If, after notice and hearing, the court finds that the witness should be
compelled to testify or otherwise produce evidence or information, it shall
order the witness to comply.  If the witness then refuses to comply, the
witness may be held in contempt of court.
